Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2934
Responder or suspect, defined.

Responder or suspect means any animal which exhibits a response to an official test, and such animal is classified as a responder or suspect by the testing veterinarian or laboratory.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 34.